Washington statutes.
RCW 11.110.140

Penalty.

Every false statement of material fact knowingly made or caused to be made by any person in any statement or report filed under this chapter and every other violation of this chapter is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1985 c 30 s 128. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 53 s 14. Formerly RCW 19.10.140.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.